Alaska, session 34, SB242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 06 * Section 1. AS 18.65.080 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 07 (c) A member of the state troopers operating under a contract between the 08 Department of Public Safety and a municipality under AS 44.41.075 may enforce a 09 municipal criminal ordinance if the contract between the Department of Public Safety 10 and the municipality authorizes state troopers to enforce municipal criminal 11 ordinances. 12 * Sec. 2. AS 29.35.010 is amended to read: 13 Sec. 29.35.010. General powers. All municipalities have the following 14 general powers, subject to other provisions of law: 01 (1) to establish and prescribe a salary for an elected or appointed 02 municipal official or employee; 03 (2) to combine two or more appointive or administrative offices; 04 (3) to establish and prescribe the functions of a municipal department, 05 office, or agency; 06 (4) to require periodic and special reports from a municipal department 07 to be submitted through the mayor; 08 (5) to investigate an affair of the municipality and make inquiries into 09 the conduct of a municipal department; 10 (6) to levy a tax or special assessment, and impose a lien for its 11 enforcement; 12 (7) to enforce an ordinance and to prescribe a penalty for violation of 13 an ordinance; 14 (8) to acquire, manage, control, use, and dispose of real and personal 15 property, whether the property is situated inside or outside the municipal boundaries; 16 this power includes the power of a borough to expend, for any purpose authorized by 17 law, money received from the disposal of land in a service area established under 18 AS 29.35.450; 19 (9) to expend money for a community purpose, facility, or service for 20 the good of the municipality to the extent the municipality is otherwise authorized by 21 law to exercise the power necessary to accomplish the purpose or provide the facility 22 or service; 23 (10) to regulate the operation and use of a municipal right-of-way, 24 facility, or service; 25 (11) to borrow money and issue evidences of indebtedness; 26 (12) to acquire membership in an organization that promotes 27 legislation for the good of the municipality; 28 (13) to enter into an agreement, including an agreement for 29 cooperative or joint administration of any function or power with a municipality, the 30 state, or the United States; 31 (14) to sue and be sued; 01 (15) to provide facilities or services for the confinement and care of 02 prisoners and enter into agreements with the state, another municipality, or any person 03 relating to the confinement and care of prisoners; 04 (16) to receive grants from and contract with the Department of Public 05 Safety under AS 18.65.670 and AS 44.41.075; 06 (17) to provide by ordinance for the creation, recording, and notice of a 07 lien on real or personal property to secure payment of past due utility fees, costs 08 incurred by the municipality in the abatement of an unsafe or dangerous building, and 09 other fees and charges provided for by ordinance; except as otherwise provided by 10 state law, when recorded, a municipal lien under this paragraph has priority over all 11 other liens except 12 (A) liens for property taxes, special assessments, and sales and 13 use taxes; 14 (B) liens that were perfected before the recording of the lien 15 under this paragraph; 16 (C) liens that, under state law, are prior, paramount, and 17 superior to all other liens; and 18 (D) mechanics' and materialmen's liens for which claims of lien 19 under AS 34.35.070 or notices of right to lien under AS 34.35.064 have been 20 recorded before the recording of the lien under this paragraph. 21 * Sec. 3. AS 37.05.146(c) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 22 (87) fees collected by the Department of Public Safety under 23 AS 44.41.075. 24 * Sec. 4. AS 44.41.020 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 25 (l) The Department of Public Safety may enter into a contract with a 26 municipality to provide law enforcement services under AS 44.41.075. 27 * Sec. 5. AS 44.41 is amended by adding a new section to read: 28 Sec. 44.41.075. Contracts with municipalities. (a) The Department of Public 29 Safety may contract with a municipality to provide routine patrol, emergency 30 response, major case investigation, and administrative support to the municipality. The 31 Department of Public Safety may charge a municipality reasonable fees to cover the 01 costs of providing services under a contract under this section. A contract under this 02 section must be in writing and must require that a state trooper may be supervised only 03 by an employee of the Department of Public Safety. A contract under this section may 04 not be longer than 20 years in duration. A municipality or the Department of Public 05 Safety may terminate a contract under this section on July 1 of any year by providing 06 written notice to the other party 24 months before the termination date. 07 (b) The state shall reimburse a municipality that enters into a contract under 08 this section a percentage of the total cost of the contract according to the population of 09 the municipality, as follows: 10 (1) 100 percent if the population is less than 2,000; 11 (2) 50 percent if the population is 2,000 - 4,999; 12 (3) 30 percent if the population is 5,000 - 14,999; 13 (4) 10 percent if the population is 15,000 - 49,999; or 14 (5) zero percent if the population is 50,000 or greater. 15 (c) Notwithstanding (b) of this section, the state shall reimburse a second class 16 borough that enters into a contract under this section an amount equal to 50 percent of 17 the total cost of the contract. 18 (d) The reimbursement program established in this section is subject to 19 legislative appropriation and available funding. 20 (e) The commissioner of public safety shall prepare and publish an annual 21 report on activities conducted under this section in the previous calendar year. The 22 report must detail the number of active contracts with a municipality, costs associated 23 with each contract, staffing and deployment statistics, performance outcomes, and 24 implementation issues. The commissioner of public safety shall submit the report to 25 the senate secretary and chief clerk of the house of representatives on or before the 26 first day of each regular session of the legislature and shall notify the legislature that 27 the report is available. 28 * Sec. 6. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.